Utah statutes.
16-10a-731.   Voting agreements.
(1)  Two or more persons, one or more of whom are shareholders, may provide
for the manner in which the shareholders will vote their shares by signing an
agreement for that purpose.  A voting agreement created under this section is
not subject to the provisions of Section 16-10a-730.
(2)  A voting agreement created under this section may be specifically
enforceable.
